Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202281-2247.01
Representative of the office, defined.

Representative of the office means an employee or volunteer designated by the state long-term care ombudsman to fulfill the duties of the office, whether personnel supervision is provided by the state long-term care ombudsman or his or her designee or by an agency hosting a local long-term care ombudsman designated by the state long-term care ombudsman.

Laws 2018, LB903, § 10.